Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.220

Acceptance of federal aid—1925 ex.s. c 182.

The assent of the legislature of the state of Washington to the provisions of the act of congress approved February 24, 1925, entitled "An Act to authorize the more complete endowment of agricultural experiment stations and for other purposes," is hereby given.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.220. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 182 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.80.205; 28.80.190, part.]